Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.040

Lieutenant governor acts in governor's absence.

If the governor absents himself or herself from the state, he or she shall, prior to his or her departure, notify the lieutenant governor of his or her proposed absence, and during such absence the lieutenant governor shall perform all the duties of the governor.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5014; 1965 c 8 s 43.06.040. Prior: 1890 p 629 s 6; RRS s 10985.]

NOTES:

Duties of lieutenant governor: State Constitution Art. 3 s 16.